North Dakota, session 69, HB1499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 44-04-18.3 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Except as provided in subsection 5, a telephone number and the home address of a
prosecutor, justice of the United States, federal judge, magistrate judge, supreme court justice,
district court judge, judicial referee, juvenile court director or probation officer, an employee of
a law enforcement agency, employee of a state or local correctional facility, and an employee
of the department of corrections and rehabilitation are confidential. Information contained in a
personnel record of an employee of the department of corrections and rehabilitation may not
be disclosed to an inmate in the legal custody of the department of corrections and
rehabilitation confined in a jail, prison, or other correctional facility unless authorized by the
director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation. Information contained in a
personnel record of a law enforcement officer of a state or local law enforcement agency or in
the personnel record of a correctional employee of a correctional facility subject to chapter
12-44.1 may not be disclosed to an inmate confined in a state correctional facility or
correctional facility subject to chapter 12-44.1 unless authorized by the employing agency.

H. B. NO. 1499 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1499.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 5 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State